Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,147.06
Hazardous material endorsement; transfer from another state; procedure.

An applicant who transfers from another state shall surrender his or her commercial driver's license with a hazardous material endorsement before the issuance of a commercial driver's license by the State of Nebraska. The renewal period established in the preceding state shall be the expiration date for the Nebraska license if a determination of threat assessment has been completed by the other state prior to issuance of the license. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall issue prorated licenses with appropriate prorated fees prescribed in section 60-4,115 to applicants transferring from another state. Applicants transferring from another state who have completed the determination of threat assessment shall not be required to undergo a determination of threat assessment until the determination of threat assessment established in the preceding state expires.

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 21.